Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-212
Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-212 to 29-214.01, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Missing person means a person who has been reported as missing to a law enforcement agency; and

(2) Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse means the repository established within the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant to section 29-214.01.

Laws 1985, LB 187, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 111, § 1.